Louisiana, session 2026, HB326.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:385.1(B)(3) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§385.1. Qualifications of elected chief of police
* * *
B.
* * *
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, an
elected chief of police in the village of Tickfaw shall reside within the corporate
limits of the village. At the time of qualification as a candidate for the office of chief
of police, a person shall have been domiciled in the village for at least the
immediately preceding year.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.